Arkansas, session 2025, HB1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 114, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-114-410. Prohibition on raffles for student-athlete funding.
A raffle shall not be conducted to provide funding for a student-
athlete under the Arkansas Student-Athlete Publicity Rights Act, § 4-75-1301
et seq.







*CRH051*
01/08/2025 3:21:17 PM CRH051